California, session 20252026, SB1231.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The sum of ____ ($____) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Attorney General to pay for the judgment in the case of ____.Any funds appropriated in excess of the amounts actually required for the payment of this judgment shall revert to the General Fund on June 30 of the fiscal year in which the final payment is made. SEC. 2. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to pay judgment and settlement claims against the state and end hardship to claimants as quickly as possible, it is necessary for this act to take effect immediately.